Utah statutes.
58-73-303.   Terms of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.
(1) (a)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in
accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.
(b)  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as
one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.
(2)  At the time of renewal, the licensee shall show satisfactory evidence of
completion of continuing education as defined by rule.
(3)  Each license expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless
the licensee renews it in accordance with Section 58-1-308.
